District of Columbia statutes.
32-1453

Exceptions.

(a)

An employer may prohibit an employee with regular access to information regarding the wages of other employees in the course of the employees work, such as a human resources employee, from sharing such information, unless the disclosure is in furtherance of or response to an investigation, action, or hearing, or there is a legal obligation for the employer to furnish the information.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall require:

(1)

An employer to disclose the wages of an employee in response to an inquiry by another employee; or

(2)

An employee to disclose his or her wages in response to an inquiry by another employee.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-219, § 4, 62 DCR 9